Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 4. Auditor and Treasurer
§ 9-1-412.
Offenses by auditor and treasurer; penalties.

If the state treasurer willfully refuses to pay any warrant lawfully drawn upon the treasury, the holder of the warrant may recover four (4) times the amount of the warrant in a civil action against the state treasurer and his sureties. Upon conviction, the treasurer is guilty of a misdemeanor.

If the state auditor knowingly issues any warrant upon the state treasury not authorized by law, he is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than four (4) times the amount of the warrant, imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

A person who violates W.S. 9-1-403(b) or W.S. 9-1-409(a) commits a felony punishable by a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) and by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 113, Part V, §§ 3 to 5; Laws 1882, ch. 3, § 29; R.S. 1887, §§ 1716 to 1718, 1735; R.S. 1899, §§ 79, 87, 5101 to 5103; C.S. 1910, §§ 116, 124, 5952 to 5954; C.S. 1920, §§ 126, 132, 7241 to 7243; R.S. 1931, §§ 32-632 to 32-634, 109-310, 109-403; C.S. 1945, § 18-516 to 18-518, 18-529; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-66, 9-67, 9-78, 9-83; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-2-314, 9-2-315, 9-2-338, 9-2-352; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to offenses by public officials, see §

6-5-101

et seq.

§ 9-1-413.
Report of financial commitments.

At the request of the state treasurer all state agencies and departments making financial commitments payable from the state treasury shall report to the state treasurer on forms prescribed by him the commitments made and the approximate date payable.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-17.1, 9-17.2; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-1-120, 9-1-121; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 9-1-414.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 123, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 1, related to annual reports of debts due the state.

§ 9-1-415.
Collection of debts due the state; discharge of uncollectible debts.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, any office or agency of the state may use the services of a collection agency licensed in Wyoming to assist in the collection of debts due the state or any state office or agency. Any person owing a debt submitted to a collection agency under this section may be assessed a fee in an amount necessary to cover the cost of collection, not to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the debt owed. The collection agency shall collect the fee with the debt that is submitted for collection.

Any debt due and owing the state or any office or agency of the state, which is determined to be uncollectible, shall be certified to the state auditor by the chief administrative officer of the agency to which the debt is due. The certification shall include:

The name and last known address of the debtor;

The goods or services for which the debt was incurred;

The amount of the debt and the date when the debt became due and payable;

An explanation of what actions have been taken to collect the debt and why the debt has remained unpaid; and

A declaration that the debt is uncollectible.

If the auditor agrees the debt is uncollectible, he shall direct that the debt be discharged and extinguished as an asset or account receivable of the state.

The facts and actions which are the basis for the decision that the debt is uncollectible shall be documented in writing and shall be maintained as required under W.S.

9-2-410

.

Before any billing for services, collections or use of the services of a collection agency, state institutions shall first make an administrative determination that all statutory requirements relative to patient billing have been followed in each case. In the case of those state institutions defined by W.S. 25-11-101(a)(vii), the decision of whether to contract with a collection agency shall be made by the department of health or the department of family services pursuant to W.S.

25-11-106

.

No patient billing from the state hospital shall be collectible unless:

A legally responsible person has been advised in writing before the treatment or stay at the hospital, at the time of admission or a reasonable time thereafter, of:

The obligation to pay;

The schedule of actual costs for treatment established by the department of health pursuant to W.S. 25-11-102(a);

The sliding scale used to determine established charges pursuant to W.S.

25-11-103

(a); and

The right to appeal pursuant to W.S.

25-11-103

.

The patient has been provided with a monthly billing statement; and

The statutory requirements for the determination of patient billing have been followed.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 221, § 1; 1987, ch. 27, § 1; ch. 123, § 1; 1989, ch. 50, § 2; 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2018 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2006 amendment

made a stylistic change in (f)(i)D).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary to a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), added the second and third sentences.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-1-416.
Local investment pool.

Upon request by any county, municipality, school district or any other local governmental entity, and as provided in W.S. 9-3-503(a), the state treasurer shall invest funds of one (1) or more of those entities on a pooled basis in the same manner as the state treasurer makes short term investments of state funds. The state treasurer shall adopt rules and regulations which:

Provide for the transmittal of funds from the entities to the state treasurer for investment, the manner in which the funds may be withdrawn from the investment pool by entities, accounting and reporting procedures and any other provisions which will effectively carry out the purposes of this section; and

Establish fees to be charged to local governmental entities which request investment assistance under this section. The fees collected shall not exceed the direct costs incurred by the state treasurer in providing the investment assistance. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into an account to be known as the investment assistance account.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the state of Wyoming to reimburse government entities for any losses that may occur on investments under this section.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 5, § 1; 1993, ch. 12, § 1; 1996, ch. 112, § 2; 1998, ch. 41, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the enterprise fund” in the last sentence in (a)(ii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-1-417.
Interfund loans; repayment; maximum amount; interest.

The state treasurer and the state auditor may utilize interfund loans from the legislative stabilization reserve account, or the general fund if insufficient funds exist in the legislative stabilization reserve account, to any other fund or account to meet obligations which come due prior to receipt of revenues. The interfund loans shall be repaid as soon as the anticipated revenue is received. The total amount of interfund loans under this subsection outstanding at one (1) time shall not exceed sixty million dollars ($60,000,000.00). These loans shall not be used to fund shortages caused by expenditures exceeding projected revenues but are to be used only to fund temporary shortages caused by meeting obligations which come due prior to receipt of revenues. The interest charged on each interfund loan under this subsection, other than to the general fund or budget reserve account, shall be the interest rate earned on pooled fund investments in the previous fiscal year.

To the extent the legislature provides for interfund loans or borrowing authority from one (1) agency, account or fund to another, the interfund loan or borrowing shall come out of the legislative stabilization reserve account to be credited to the borrowing agency, account or fund, except as authorized by W.S.

21-13-316

. The interest charged on each interfund loan or borrowing from the legislative stabilization reserve account shall be the interest rate earned on pooled fund investments for the fiscal year immediately preceding the effective date of the interfund loan.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 25,§ 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-1-416

; Laws 2000, ch. 12, § 1; 2018 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 43, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

in (a), substituted “from the legislative stabilization reserve” for “from the general fund or the budget reserve,” inserted “or the general fund if insufficient funds exist in the legislative stabilization reserve account” following “reserve account” in the first sentence, and added the last sentence; and added (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a) inserted "under this subsection" in two places; and in (b) substituted "as authorized by" for "for interfund loans made under" following "account or fund."

§ 9-1-418.
Pooled fund investment loans; maximum amount; repayment; interest.

The state auditor is authorized to borrow from the legislative stabilization reserve account an amount not to exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) at any one (1) time to meet the obligations of the department of transportation which come due prior to the receipt of revenues. The amounts borrowed under this section shall be repaid as soon as the anticipated revenue is received. Interest on the unpaid balance shall be equal to the rate of return earned on pooled fund investments in the previous fiscal year. These loans shall not be used to fund shortages caused by expenditures exceeding projected revenues but are to be used only to fund temporary shortages caused by meeting obligations which come due prior to receipt of revenues.

History.

2017 ch. 13, § 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted “borrow from the legislative stabilization reserve account an amount” for “borrow from pooled fund investments in the treasurer's office an amount” in the first sentence and deleted “the greater of two percent (2%) or” preceding “the rate of return earned” in the third sentence.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 13, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.